Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2872
Delegated dispensing agreements; authorized.

A pharmacist may delegate certain specified dispensing tasks and functions under specified conditions and limitations to another person by entering into a delegated dispensing agreement which serves as the basis for a delegated dispensing permit. A delegated dispensing agreement shall include the address of the site where the dispensing will occur, the name and license number of each pharmacist who will assume the responsibilities of the delegating pharmacist, the name and signature of any individual who will be dispensing pursuant to such agreement, the manner in which inspections must be conducted and documented by the delegating pharmacist, and any other information required by the board. A delegated dispensing agreement shall not become effective until a delegated dispensing permit based upon such agreement is issued by the department, with the recommendation of the board, pursuant to section 38-2873.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 47;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,147.62;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 968.